Vermont, session 2025-2026, H58.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 1901n is added to read:
§ 1901n. MEDICAID COVERAGE FOR PLAY THERAPY
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall provide Medicaid coverage for
medically necessary play therapy services provided by an individual who holds
VT LEG #379079 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.58
2025 Page 2 of 2
an eligible play therapy credential as determined by the Agency in rule and
who is licensed to practice medicine pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 33
specializing in the practice of psychiatry, a psychologist licensed pursuant to
26 V.S.A. chapter 55, a master’s social worker licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A.
chapter 61, a clinical mental health counselor licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A.
chapter 65, a marriage and family therapist licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A.
chapter 76, or a psychoanalyst licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 77.
(b) As used in this section, “play therapy” means a therapeutic modality
that utilizes playing with toys and games and role-playing as a means of
addressing cognitive, behavioral, emotional, and mental health challenges.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379079 v.1